Utah statutes.
76-6-504.   Tampering with records -- Penalty.

(1)  Any person who, having no privilege to do so, knowingly falsifies, destroys, removes, or conceals any writing, other than the writings enumerated in Section 76-6-503.5 for which the law provides public recording or any record, public or private, with intent to deceive or injure any person or to conceal any wrongdoing is guilty of tampering with records.

(2)  Tampering with records is a class B misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 93, 2005 General Session

